Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 3. Wholesale Licenses.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.100.
General wholesale license.

A general wholesale license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages at wholesale. The holder of a general wholesale license may not sell to a person not licensed under this title, except as provided in AS

04.21.040

.

The biennial general wholesale license fee is $2,000.

In addition to the license fee under (b) of this section, the holder of a general wholesale license shall pay an annual fee based on the total value of business transacted by the wholesale business, including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

. If the total value of business transacted during the calendar year including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

is

less than or equal to $100,000, then the annual fee is $0;

over $100,000 and not over $150,000, then the annual fee is $250;

over $150,000 and not over $200,000, then the annual fee is $500;

over $200,000 and not over $250,000, then the annual fee is $750;

over $250,000 and not over $300,000, then the annual fee is $1,000;

over $300,000 and not over $350,000, then the annual fee is $1,250;

over $350,000 and not over $400,000, then the annual fee is $1,500;

over $400,000 and not over $500,000, then the annual fee is $2,000;

over $500,000 and not over $600,000, then the annual fee is $2,500;

over $600,000 and not over $700,000, then the annual fee is $3,000;

over $700,000 and not over $800,000, then the annual fee is $3,500;

over $800,000 and not over $1,000,000, then the annual fee is $4,500;

over $1,000,000, then the annual fee is $10,000.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.110.
Limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license.

A limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license authorizes the holder to sell brewed beverages and wine at wholesale. The holder of a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license may not sell to a person not licensed under this title, except as provided in AS

04.21.040

.

The biennial limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license fee is $400.00

In addition to the license fee under (b) of this section, the holder of a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license shall pay an annual fee based on the total value of business transacted by the wholesale business, including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

. If the total value of business transacted during the calendar year including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

is

less than or equal to $20,000, then the annual fee is $0;

over $20,000 and not over $50,000, then the annual fee is $150;

over $50,000 and not over $100,000, then the annual fee is $500;

over $100,000 and not over $150,000, then the annual fee is $750;

over $150,000 and not over $200,000, then the annual fee is $1,000;

over $200,000 and not over $400,000, then the annual fee is $2,000;

over $400,000 and not over $600,000, then the annual fee is $3,000;

over $600,000 and not over $800,000, then the annual fee is $4,000;

over $800,000, then the annual fee is $10,000.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.120.
Annual fee and affidavit.

Not later than February 28 of each year, the holder of a general wholesale license or a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license shall pay the annual fee for the license for the preceding calendar year and file with the board an affidavit showing the

total value of business transacted under the license by the wholesale business, including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

, during the preceding calendar year; and

location of the licensed premises at which the business was transacted.

Failure to file an affidavit under (a) of this section or the expiration of a license under AS

04.11.540

does not relieve a licensee from paying the prescribed annual fee.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.130.
Wholesale supplier declaration.

A person who applies for issuance or renewal of a general wholesale license or a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license shall submit to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, a declaration that the person is the appointed wholesaler of the distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer of each product line of alcoholic beverage that the person intends to purchase, offer for sale, or sell. The form must include a space for the person to indicate the total number of suppliers. The board may request a list of suppliers or additional information about a product line.

A person filing a declaration under this section shall pay a biennial filing fee. If the declaration lists

one to 25 suppliers, the fee is $500;

26 to 50 suppliers, the fee is $1,000;

51 to 75 suppliers, the fee is $1,500;

76 or more suppliers, the fee is $2,000.

In this section, “distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer” includes an exclusive agent of the distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer if the agent’s name appears on the label of the brand approved by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.140.
Unlicensed wholesale sale.

A person commits the crime of unlicensed wholesale sale if the person knowingly sells

distilled spirits at wholesale without a general wholesale license; or

brewed beverages or wine at wholesale without a general wholesale license or a limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license.

Unlicensed wholesale sale is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.150.
Failure to pay annual fee or file affidavit.

A person commits the offense of failure to pay an annual wholesale fee or file a wholesale affidavit if the person fails to pay the annual fee or file the affidavit as required under AS

04.09.120

.

Failure to pay an annual wholesale fee or file a wholesale affidavit is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.160.
Failure to pay biennial fee or file declaration.

A person commits the offense of failure to pay a biennial supplier fee or file a supplier declaration if the person fails to pay the biennial supplier fee or file the declaration as required under AS

04.09.130

.

Failure to pay a biennial supplier fee or file a supplier declaration is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)